District of Columbia statutes.
29-1207.06

Chapter not exclusive.

This chapter shall not preclude an organization from being merged under law other than this chapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 706 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.